Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2499
Donations; handling fee.

Any individual or entity, including, but not limited to, a prescription drug manufacturer or health care facility, may donate prescription drugs, over-the-counter medicines and products, and supplies to the program. A health care facility or pharmacy may charge a handling fee for distributing or dispensing prescription drugs or supplies under the program.

Laws 2024, LB1035, § 4.